src/fst/morphology/stems/subjunctions.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Subjunctions

LEXICON Cs  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+CS: # ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** adding tags

LEXICON Subjunction !!≈ @CODE@

tassaaš% ko Cs ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
muide% ko Cs ;
tegu Cs ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
ete Cs ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
jos:jos Cs ;  !!≈ * and 2o more
et Cs ;
veik Cs ;
te	Cs ;
mutâ Cs ;
veikkâ Cs ;
veik Cs ;
ceelhi Cs ;
jis Cs "ellen" ;
jis+CS+Foc/ba:jispa # ;
jis+CS+Foc/sun:jissun # ;
amas Cs "ettei" ;
vâi Cs "jotta" ;
tastko Cs "koska" ;
tastko+Err/Orth:tasko Cs "koska" ;
kuás Cs "koska" ;
ko Cs "kun" ;
ko+CS+Foc/han:kohân # "kunhan" ;
tassaaš Cs "kunnes" ;
kuo Cs "kunpa" ;
vâik Cs "vaikka" ;
ovdilgo Cs ;
ovdil-uv Cs ;
tego Cs ;
tiego Cs "kuten" ;
jágo Cs "ja kun" ; ! Ton ääigi lii ain joskâ ko skihtee, jágo pavkkâl já ij teivid te hirmâd karolarmâ.
nuuvtko Cs ;
